Maryland, session 2025, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT PRODUCE
ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS MAY BE CONSTRUCTED, PERMITTED, AND OPERATED
IN THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON CONSTRUCTING AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING
TO REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN:
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY; OR
(2) COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE
GENERATING SYSTEM.
7–510.
(c) (6) (I) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS
TITLE, AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY OR ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY:
1. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN GENERATING FACILITIES; AND
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN TRANSMISSION FACILITIES NECESSARY TO INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING
FACILITIES WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(II) [In] IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IT IS
NECESSARY IN order to meet long–term, anticipated demand in the State for standard
offer service and other electricity supply, the Commission may require [or allow], SUBJECT
TO APPROPRIATE COST RECOVERY, an investor–owned electric company to:
1. construct, acquire, or lease, and operate, its own
generating facilities[,]; and
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN transmission facilities necessary to interconnect the generating facilities with the
electric [grid, subject to appropriate cost recovery] SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 1329 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the General Assembly supports the development of additional nuclear
energy in the State, including small modular reactors and the combination of nuclear
energy and energy produced from natural gas, for reliable clean energy in the State; and
(2) the General Assembly encourages PJM Interconnection, LLC to provide
an expedited interconnection process for new thermal generation resources in the State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.